New York, session 2025-2026, A814.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 847 of the executive law as added by a chapter of 2 the laws of 2024 amending the penal law and the executive law relating 3 to the safe storage of firearms and child access prevention, as proposed 4 in legislative bills numbers S. 9760 and A. 10356-A, is REPEALED. 5 § 2. Section 206 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 6 subdivision 32 to read as follows: 7 32. (a) On or before July first, two thousand twenty-five, the commis- 8 sioner shall develop and implement a public awareness campaign to 9 educate the public on the safe storage of firearms, rifles and shotguns 10 and child access and prevention. The public awareness campaign shall 11 include, but not be limited to, educational materials, resources and 12 information related to New York state child access prevention laws and 13 laws relating to the safe storage and transport of firearms, rifles and 14 shotguns including sections 265.45, 265.46, and 400.00 of the penal law, 15 available methods for the safe storage of firearms, rifles and shotguns 16 designed to prevent child access, firearm violence prevention resources, 17 and county and local specific laws and regulations related to child 18 access prevention and safe storage of firearms, rifles and shotguns. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02703-01-5 A. 814 2 1 (b) On or before July first, two thousand twenty-five, the commission- 2 er shall make the educational materials developed for use in this public 3 awareness campaign readily shareable in a digital format and make the 4 materials available on the public facing portion of the department's 5 website. The commissioner shall make the educational materials readily 6 available to any agency who requests such educational materials for 7 dissemination. 8 (c) On July first, two thousand twenty-six, and each July first there- 9 after, the department shall update, as necessary, the educational mate- 10 rials developed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision and make 11 available and disseminate the updated materials pursuant to paragraph 12 (b) of this subdivision. 13 § 3. Section 4 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the penal law 14 and the executive law relating to the safe storage of firearms and child 15 access prevention, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9760 and 16 A. 10356-A, is amended to read as follows: 17 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately, provided however, that 18 section one of this act shall take effect July 1, 2025. Effective imme- 19 diately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 20 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 21 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. 22 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 23 sections one and two of this act shall take effect on the same date and 24 in the same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the penal 25 law and the executive law relating to the safe storage of firearms and 26 child access prevention, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 27 9760 and A. 10356-A, takes effect.